District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-522

Lessee’s right to goods on lessor’s insolvency.

(a)

Subject to subsection (b) of this section and even though the goods have not been shipped, a lessee who has paid a part or all of the rent and security for goods identified to a lease contract (§ 28:2A-217) on making and keeping good a tender of any unpaid portion of the rent and security due under the lease contract may recover the goods identified from the lessor if the lessor becomes insolvent within 10 days after receipt of the first installment of rent and security.

(b)

A lessee acquires the right to recover goods identified to a lease contract only if they conform to the lease contract.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28:2A-508.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-522.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-502.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Conforming”. Section 2A-103(1)(d).

“Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

“Insolvent”. Section 1-201(23).

“Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).

“Receipt”. Section 2-103(1)(c).

“Rights”. Section 1-201(36).